Massachusetts, session 194th, H4286.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. (a) Notwithstanding section 17 of chapter 138 of the General Laws, the
licensing authority of the town of Somerset may grant 1 additional license for the sale of wine
and malt beverages not to be drunk on the premises pursuant to section 15 of said chapter 138 to
Olde Village Convenience Store located at 2756 County Street in the town. The license granted
pursuant to this act shall be subject to all of said chapter 138 except said section 17.
(b) The licensing authority shall not approve the transfer of a license granted pursuant to
this act to any other location, but it may grant the license to a new applicant at the same location
if the applicant files with the licensing authority a letter from the department of revenue and a
letter from the department of unemployment assistance indicating that the license is in good
standing with those departments and that all applicable taxes, fees, and contributions have been
paid.
(c) If a licensee terminates or fails to renew the license granted under this section or any
such license is cancelled, revoked or no longer in use, it shall be returned physically, with all of
of 2

the legal rights, privileges and restrictions pertaining thereto, to the licensing authority which
may, within 3 years after such return, then grant the license to a new applicant at the same
location and under the same terms and conditions as specified in this section, otherwise such
license shall dissolve.
(d) The license granted under this act shall be issued within 1 year after the effective date
of this act; provided, however, that if the license is originally granted within that time period, it
may be granted to a new applicant under subsections (b) and (c) thereafter.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2